North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-09 Old-Age and Survivor Insurance [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 439, § 104]

52-09-01.
System established. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0901; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-02.
Purpose of chapter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0902; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-02.1.
Administration of chapter — Definition. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 446, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-03.
Administration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0903; S.L. 1965, ch. 181, § 24; 1965, ch. 333, § 7; 1979, ch. 530, § 1; 2003, ch. 446, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-04.
Enforcement of provisions of chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 446, § 6.

52-09-05.
Old-age survivors’ fund created. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0905; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-06.
Custodian and trustee of fund — Investing and disbursing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 6; 1957, ch. 181, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0906; S.L. 1965, ch. 181, § 25; 1987, ch. 603, § 1; 1995, ch. 482, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-07.
Purposes for which fund may be used — Appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 7; 1957, ch. 329, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0907; S.L. 1959, ch. 359, § 1; 1963, ch. 337, § 1; 1987, ch. 603, § 2; 1999, ch. 440, § 1; 2003, ch. 446, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-08.
Default in taxes — Interest — Action to collect — Levy of tax by political subdivisions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 8; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0908; S.L. 1959, ch. 359, § 2; 1973, ch. 396, § 1; 1981, ch. 197, § 2; 1983, ch. 593, § 32; 1983, ch. 606, § 54; 1983, ch. 608, § 14; 1987, ch. 232, § 5; 1987, ch. 604, § 1; 1991, ch. 165, § 17; 1999, ch. 440, § 2; 1999, ch. 501, § 1; 2001, ch. 458, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 93; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-09.
Rate of contribution. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 440, § 4.

52-09-10.
Overpayments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 440, § 4.

52-09-11.
Tax paid deductible in computing net income. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 440, § 4.

52-09-12.
Employer to furnish employee statement showing taxes deducted. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 440, § 4.

52-09-13.
Employer payments — Manner of payment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 440, § 4.

52-09-14.
Benefit payments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 14; 1951, ch. 296, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0914; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-15.
Deductions from and additions to benefits. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 15; 1951, ch. 296, § 2; 1953, ch. 301, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0915; S.L. 1959, ch. 359, § 4.

52-09-16.
Error in payment of amount of benefits — Adjustment — Liability. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0916; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-17.
Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0917; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-18.
Agent and attorney may represent claimant — Regulations — Fees — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0918; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 566; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-19.
False statement — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

52-09-20.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 20; 1949, ch. 307, § 1; 1949, ch. 309, § 1; 1951, ch. 296, § 3; 1951, ch. 297, §§ 1, 2; 1951, ch. 298, § 1; 1953, ch. 301, § 3; 1953, ch. 303, § 1; 1953, ch. 304, § 1; 1955, ch. 307, § 2; 1955, ch. 308, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0920; S.L. 1959, ch. 359, § 5; 1961, ch. 314, § 2; 1967, ch. 374, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 425, § 1; 1971, ch. 482, § 2; 1973, ch. 397, § 1; 1975, ch. 459, § 1; 1977, ch. 469, § 1; 1979, ch. 530, § 2; 1981, ch. 508, § 1; 1983, ch. 542, § 1; 1985, ch. 546, § 1; 1987, ch. 605, § 1; 1989, ch. 608, § 2; 1991, ch. 542, § 1; 1993, ch. 497, § 1; 1995, ch. 482, § 2; 1997, ch. 424, § 1; 1999, ch. 440, § 3; 2001, ch. 459, § 1; 2003, ch. 446, § 4; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2009, ch. 449, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-21.
Refunds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 21; 1949, ch. 308, § 3; 1953, ch. 302, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0921; S.L. 1959, ch. 360; 1959, ch. 361, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-22.
Benefits unassignable and exempt from legal remedies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 22; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0922; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-23.
When political subdivisions may apply to bureau for coverage. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 23; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0923; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-24.
System not subject to general insurance laws and regulations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 24; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0924; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-25.
Chapter applies to special charter cities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 320, § 25; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0925; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-26.
Preservation of rights of person in military service — Contribution by employer continued. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 52-0926; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.

52-09-27.
State and political subdivisions may participate in federal old-age benefits. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 283, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1949 Supp., § 52-0108; 1957 Supp., § 52-0927; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, §
104, effective January 1, 2015.